Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 40 INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM
1-40-107. Rehearing - appeal - fees - signing.

Any person presenting an initiative petition or any registered elector who is not satisfied with a decision of the title board with respect to whether a petition contains more than a single subject pursuant to section 1-40-106.5, or who is not satisfied with the titles and submission clause provided by the title board and who claims that they are unfair or that they do not fairly express the true meaning and intent of the proposed state law or constitutional amendment may file a motion for a rehearing with the secretary of state within seven days after the decision is made or the titles and submission clause are set.
(1) (a) (I) Any person presenting an initiative petition or any registered elector who is not satisfied with a decision of the title board with respect to whether a petition contains more than a single subject pursuant to section 1-40-106.5, or who is not satisfied with the titles and submission clause provided by the title board and who claims that they are unfair or that they do not fairly express the true meaning and intent of the proposed state law or constitutional amendment may file a motion for a rehearing with the secretary of state within seven days after the decision is made or the titles and submission clause are set.

The designated representatives of the proponents or any registered elector who is not satisfied with the fiscal summary prepared by the director of research of the legislative council of the general assembly in accordance with section 1-40-105.5 may file a motion for a rehearing with the secretary of state within seven days after the titles and submission clause for the initiative petition are set on the grounds that:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2020.)

The fiscal summary is misleading or prejudicial; or

The fiscal summary does not comply with the requirements set forth in section 1-40-105.5 (1.5).

The designated representatives of the proponents or any registered elector who is not satisfied with the determination by the title board made pursuant to section 1-40-106 (3.5) with respect to whether a petition that proposes a constitutional amendment only repeals in whole or in part a provision of the state constitution may file a motion for a rehearing with the secretary of state within seven days after the titles and submission clause for the initiative petition are set on the grounds that the determination is incorrect.

A motion for rehearing must be typewritten and set forth with particularity the grounds for rehearing. If the motion claims that the petition contains more than a single subject, then the motion must, at a minimum, include a short and plain statement of the reasons for the claim. If the motion claims that the title and submission clause set by the title board are unfair or that they do not fairly express the true meaning and intent of the proposed state law or constitutional amendment, then the motion must identify the specific wording that is challenged. If the motion claims that the fiscal summary is misleading or prejudicial or does not comply with the statutory requirements, the motion must specifically identify the specific wording that is challenged or the requirement at issue. The title board may modify the fiscal summary based on information presented at the rehearing. If the motion claims that the determination of whether the petition that proposes a constitutional amendment only repeals in whole or in part a constitutional provision is incorrect, the motion must include a short and plain statement of the reasons for the claim.

The motion for rehearing shall be heard at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the title board; except that, if the title board is unable to complete action on all matters scheduled for that day, consideration of any motion for rehearing may be continued to the next available day, and except that, if the titles and submission clause protested were set at the last meeting in April, the motion shall be heard within forty-eight hours after the expiration of the seven-day period for the filing of such motions. The decision of the title board on any motion for rehearing shall be final, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and no further motion for rehearing may be filed or considered by the title board.

If any person presenting or the designated representatives of the proponents of an initiative petition for which a motion for a rehearing is filed, any registered elector who filed a motion for a rehearing pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or any other registered elector who appeared before the title board in support of or in opposition to a motion for rehearing is not satisfied with the ruling of the title board upon the motion, then the secretary of state shall furnish such person, upon request, a certified copy of the petition with the titles and submission clause of the proposed law or constitutional amendment, the fiscal summary, or the determination whether the petition repeals in whole or in part a constitutional provision, together with a certified copy of the motion for rehearing and of the ruling thereon. If filed with the clerk of the supreme court within seven days thereafter, the matter shall be disposed of promptly, consistent with the rights of the parties, either affirming the action of the title board or reversing it, in which latter case the court shall remand it with instructions, pointing out where the title board is in error.

The secretary of state shall be allowed a fee which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., for certifying a record of any proceedings before the title board. The clerk of the supreme court shall receive one-half the ordinary docket fee for docketing any such cause, all of which shall be paid by the parties desiring a review of such proceedings.

No petition for any initiative measure shall be circulated nor any signature thereto have any force or effect which has been signed before the titles and submission clause have been fixed and determined as provided in section 1-40-106 and this section, or before the fiscal summary has been fixed and determined as provided in section 1-40-105.5 and this section.

In the event a motion for rehearing is filed in accordance with this section, the period for filing a petition in accordance with section 1-40-108 shall not begin until a final decision concerning the motion is rendered by the title board or the Colorado supreme court; except that under no circumstances shall the period for filing a petition be extended beyond three months and three weeks prior to the election at which the petition is to be voted upon.

(5.5) If the title board modifies the fiscal summary pursuant to this section, the secretary of state shall provide the director of research of the legislative council of the general assembly with a copy of the amended fiscal summary, and the director shall post the new version of the fiscal summary on the legislative council website.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1622, § 5, effective August 2, 2000.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 432, § 5, effective May 8, 1995.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 680, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(1) and (7) amended, p. 432, § 5, effective May 8.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 635, § 9, effective May 6.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), (4), and (6) amended, pp. 1621, 1622, §§ 2, 5, effective August 2; (6) amended, p. 297, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 756, § 2, effective May 12.

L. 2009:

(1) and (5) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1171, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 12-1313), ch. 141, p. 511, § 2, effective April 26; (2) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 896, § 172, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (2), and (4) amended and (5.5) added, (HB 15-1057), ch. 198, p. 677, § 4, effective March 26, 2016.

L. 2017:

(1)(a)(III) added and (1)(b) and (2) amended, (SB 17-152), ch. 169, p. 616, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(1)(a)(II), (1)(b), (2), (4), and (5.5) amended, (HB 20-1416), ch. 232, p. 1124, § 3, effective November 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-107 was relocated to § 1-40-113. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the general assembly, powers, and initiative and referendum reserved to the people, see also § 1 of art. V, Colo. Const.; for recall from office, see art. XXI, Colo. Const.

1-40-108. Petition - time of filing.

No petition for any ballot issue is of any effect unless filed with the secretary of state within six months from the date that the titles and submission clause have been fixed and determined pursuant to the provisions of sections 1-40-106 and 1-40-107 and unless filed with the secretary of state no later than three months before the election at which it is to be voted upon. A petition for a ballot issue for the election to be held in November of odd-numbered years must be filed with the secretary of state no later than three months before such odd-year election. All filings under this section must be made by the close of business on the day of filing.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 433, § 6, effective May 8, 1995.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 682, § 1, effective May 4; (1) amended, p. 1437, § 127, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 433, § 6, effective May 8.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1622, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1171, § 6, effective May 15.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1668, § 70, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-104 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-108 was relocated to § 1-40-115.

Cross references:

For computation of time under the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of this title, see § 1-1-106; for computation of time under the statutes generally, see § 2-4-108.

1-40-109. Signatures required - withdrawal.

No petition for any initiated law is of any force or effect, nor shall the proposed law be submitted to the people of the state of Colorado for adoption or rejection at the polls, as is by law provided for, unless the petition for the submission of the initiated law is signed by the number of registered electors required by section 1 (2) of article V of the state constitution.

No petition for any initiated amendment to the state constitution is of any force or effect, nor shall the initiated amendment to the state constitution be submitted to the people of the state of Colorado for adoption or rejection at the polls, as is by law provided for, unless the petition for the submission of the initiated amendment to the state constitution is signed by the number of registered electors required by the state constitution who reside in each state senate district in Colorado, so long as the total number of registered electors who have signed the petition is at least the number of registered electors required by section 1 (2) of article V of the state constitution. For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), the number and boundaries of the state senate districts are those in existence, and the number of registered electors in the state senate districts is those registered, at the time the form of the petition is approved for circulation in accordance with section 1-40-113 (1)(a).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 433, § 7, effective May 8, 1995.)

Any person who is a registered elector may sign a petition for any ballot issue for which the elector is eligible to vote. A registered elector who signs a petition may withdraw his or her signature from the petition by filing a written request for such withdrawal with the secretary of state at any time on or before the day that the petition is filed with the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 682, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1180, § 73, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 433, § 7, effective May 8.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1172, § 7, effective May 15.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-152), ch. 169, p. 617, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-105 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-109 was relocated. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-40-110. Warning - ballot title.

At the top of each page of every initiative or referendum petition section shall be printed, in a form as prescribed by the secretary of state, the following:

The ballot title for the measure shall then be printed on each page following the warning.

For a petition section for a measure to be valid, the fiscal summary prepared in accordance with section 1-40-105.5 must be printed on the first page of an initiative petition section.

WARNING:
IT IS AGAINST THE LAW:

For anyone to sign any initiative or referendum petition with any name other than his or her own or to knowingly sign his or her name more than once for the same measure or to knowingly sign a petition when not a registered elector who is eligible to vote on the measure.
DO NOT SIGN THIS PETITION UNLESS YOU ARE A REGISTERED ELECTOR AND ELIGIBLE TO VOTE ON THIS MEASURE. TO BE A REGISTERED ELECTOR, YOU MUST BE A CITIZEN OF COLORADO AND REGISTERED TO VOTE.
Before signing this petition, you are encouraged to read the text or the title of the proposed initiative or referred measure.
You are also encouraged to read the fiscal summary that is included at the beginning of this petition.
By signing this petition, you are indicating that you want this measure to be included on the ballot as a proposed change to the (Colorado constitution/Colorado Revised Statutes). If a sufficient number of registered electors sign this petition, this measure will appear on the ballot at the November (year) election.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 682, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

IP(1) amended, p. 433, § 8, effective May 8.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1622, § 7, effective August 2.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1172, § 8, effective May 15.

L. 2015:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 15-1057), ch. 198, p. 678, § 5, effective March 26, 2016.

L. 2020:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 20-1416), ch. 232, p. 1126, § 4, effective November 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-106 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-110 was relocated to § 1-40-121 (1).

1-40-111. Signatures - affidavits - notarization - list of circulators and notaries.

Any initiative or referendum petition shall be signed only by registered electors who are eligible to vote on the measure. Each registered elector shall sign his or her own signature and shall print his or her name, the address at which he or she resides, including the street number and name, the city and town, the county, and the date of signing. Each registered elector signing a petition shall be encouraged by the circulator of the petition to sign the petition in ink. In the event a registered elector is physically disabled or is illiterate and wishes to sign the petition, the elector shall sign or make his or her mark in the space so provided. Any person, but not a circulator, may assist the disabled or illiterate elector in completing the remaining information required by this subsection (1). The person providing assistance shall sign his or her name and address and shall state that such assistance was given to the disabled or illiterate elector.

To each petition section shall be attached a signed, notarized, and dated affidavit executed by the person who circulated the petition section, which shall include his or her printed name, the address at which he or she resides, including the street name and number, the city or town, the county, and the date he or she signed the affidavit; that he or she has read and understands the laws governing the circulation of petitions; that he or she was a citizen of the United States and at least eighteen years of age at the time the section of the petition was circulated and signed by the listed electors; that he or she circulated the section of the petition; that each signature thereon was affixed in the circulator's presence; that each signature thereon is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be; that to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief each of the persons signing the petition section was, at the time of signing, a registered elector; that he or she has not paid or will not in the future pay and that he or she believes that no other person has paid or will pay, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value to any signer for the purpose of inducing or causing such signer to affix his or her signature to the petition; that he or she understands that he or she can be prosecuted for violating the laws governing the circulation of petitions, including the requirement that a circulator truthfully completed the affidavit and that each signature thereon was affixed in the circulator's presence; and that he or she understands that failing to make himself or herself available to be deposed and to provide testimony in the event of a protest shall invalidate the petition section if it is challenged on the grounds of circulator fraud.

A notary public shall not notarize an affidavit required pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, unless:

The circulator is in the physical presence of the notary public; and

The circulator has dated the affidavit and fully and accurately completed all of the personal information on the affidavit required pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section.

An affidavit that is notarized in violation of any provision of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall be invalid.

If the date signed by a circulator on an affidavit required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) is different from the date signed by the notary public, the affidavit shall be invalid. If, notwithstanding sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), a notary public notarizes an affidavit that has not been dated by the circulator, the notarization date shall not cure the circulator's failure to sign the affidavit and the affidavit shall be invalid.

The secretary of state shall reject any section of a petition that does not have attached thereto a valid notarized affidavit that complies with all of the requirements set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2). Any signature added to a section of a petition after the affidavit has been executed shall be invalid.

As part of any court proceeding or hearing conducted by the secretary of state related to a protest of all or part of a petition section, the circulator of such petition section shall be required to make himself or herself available to be deposed and to testify in person, by telephone, or by any other means permitted under the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Except as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the petition section that is the subject of the protest shall be invalid if a circulator fails to comply with the requirement set forth in this paragraph (a) for any protest that includes an allegation of circulator fraud that is pled with particularity regarding:

Forgery of a registered elector's signature;

Circulation of a petition section, in whole or part, by anyone other than the person who signs the affidavit attached to the petition section;

Use of a false circulator name or address in the affidavit; or

Payment of money or other things of value to any person for the purpose of inducing the person to sign the petition.

Upon the finding by a district court or the secretary of state that the circulator of a petition section is unable to be deposed or to testify at trial or a hearing conducted by the secretary of state because the circulator has died, become mentally incompetent, or become medically incapacitated and physically unable to testify by any means whatsoever, the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall not apply to invalidate a petition section circulated by the circulator.

The proponents of a petition or an issue committee acting on the proponents' behalf shall maintain a list of the names and addresses of all circulators who circulated petition sections on behalf of the proponents and notaries public who notarized petition sections on behalf of the proponents and the petition section numbers that each circulator circulated and that each notary public notarized. A copy of the list shall be filed with the secretary of state along with the petition. If a copy of the list is not filed, the secretary of state shall prepare the list and charge the proponents a fee, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., to cover the cost of the preparation. Once filed or prepared by the secretary of state, the list shall be a public record for purposes of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 683, § 1, effective May 4; (2)(a) amended, p. 2049, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 433, § 9, effective May 8.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1982, § 34, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(2) amended and (3) and (4) added, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1172, § 9, effective May 15.

L. 2018:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 18-1145), ch. 113, p. 807, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(2)(b)(I) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1668, § 71, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-106 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-111 was relocated to § 1-40-101.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1145, see section 1 of chapter 113, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

1-40-112. Circulators - requirements - training.

No person shall circulate a petition for an initiative or referendum measure unless the person is a citizen of the United States and at least eighteen years of age at the time the petition is circulated.

A circulator who is not to be paid for circulating a petition concerning a ballot issue shall display an identification badge that includes the words "VOLUNTEER CIRCULATOR" in bold-faced type that is clearly legible.

A circulator who is to be paid for circulating a petition concerning a ballot issue shall display an identification badge that includes the words "PAID CIRCULATOR" in bold-faced type that is clearly legible and the name and telephone number of the individual employing the circulator.

The secretary of state shall develop circulator training programs for paid and volunteer circulators. Such programs shall be conducted in the broadest, most cost-effective manner available to the secretary of state, including but not limited to training sessions for persons associated with the proponents or a petition entity, as defined in section 1-40-135 (1), and by electronic and remote access. The proponents of an initiative petition or the representatives of a petition entity shall inform paid and volunteer circulators of the availability of these training programs as one manner of complying with the requirement set forth in the circulator's affidavit that a circulator read and understand the laws pertaining to petition circulation.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 684, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1982, § 35, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(3) and (4) added, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1174, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1) amended and (4) repealed, (HB 18-1145), ch. 113, p. 808, § 3, effective August 8.

1-40-113. Form - representatives of signers.

Each section of a petition shall be printed on a form as prescribed by the secretary of state. No petition shall be printed, published, or otherwise circulated unless the form and the first printer's proof of the petition have been approved by the secretary of state. The designated representatives of the proponent are responsible for filing the printer's proof with the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify the designated representatives whether the printer's proof is approved. Each petition section shall designate by name and mailing address two persons who shall represent the signers thereof in all matters affecting the same. The secretary of state shall assure that the petition contains only the matters required by this article and contains no extraneous material. All sections of any petition shall be prenumbered serially, and the circulation of any petition section described by this article other than personally by a circulator is prohibited. Any petition section circulated in whole or in part by anyone other than the person who signs the affidavit attached to the petition section shall be invalid. Any petition section that fails to conform to the requirements of this article or is circulated in a manner other than that permitted in this article shall be invalid.

The secretary of state shall notify the proponents at the time a petition is approved pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) that the proponents must register an issue committee pursuant to section 1-45-108 (3.3) if two hundred or more petition sections are printed or accepted in connection with circulation of the petition.

The secretary of state shall notify the proponents at the time a petition format for an initiated amendment to the state constitution is approved pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section of the number and boundaries of the state senate districts in existence and the number of registered electors in each state senate district at the time of approval.

The secretary of state shall notify the director of research of the legislative council at the time a petition is approved pursuant to (1)(a) of this section.

Any disassembly of a section of the petition which has the effect of separating the affidavits from the signatures shall render that section of the petition invalid and of no force and effect.

Each section of the petition must include the affidavits required by section 1-40-111 (2), together with the sheets containing the signatures accompanying the same.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 684, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 434, § 10, effective May 8.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1175, § 11, effective May 15.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1370), ch. 270, p. 1240, § 2, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2011:

(1)(a) and (3) amended, (HB 11-1072), ch. 255, p. 1104, § 4, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1)(c) added, (SB 17-152), ch. 169, p. 618, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(1)(d) added, (HB 20-1416), ch. 232, p. 1126, § 5, effective November 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1669, § 72, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-107 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-113 was relocated to § 1-40-123.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 270, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

(2) For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsections (1)(a) and (3), see section 1 of chapter 255, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

1-40-114. Petitions - not election materials - no bilingual language requirement.

The general assembly hereby determines that initiative petitions are not election materials or information covered by the federal "Voting Rights Act of 1965", and therefore are not required to be printed in any language other than English to be circulated in any county in Colorado.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 685, § 1, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-107.5 (3) as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-114 was relocated. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-40-115. Ballot - voting - publication.

Measures shall appear upon the official ballot by ballot title only. The measures shall be placed on the ballot in the order in which they were certified to the ballot and as provided in section 1-5-407 (5), (5.3), and (5.4).

All ballot measures shall be printed on the official ballot in that order, together with their respective letters and numbers prefixed in bold-faced type. A ballot issue arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution shall appear in capital letters. Each ballot shall have the following explanation printed one time at the beginning of such ballot measures: "Ballot questions referred by the general assembly or any political subdivision are listed by letter, and ballot questions initiated by the people are listed numerically. A ballot question listed as an 'amendment' proposes a change to the Colorado constitution, and a ballot question listed as a 'proposition' proposes a change to the Colorado Revised Statutes. A 'yes/for' vote on any ballot question is a vote in favor of changing current law or existing circumstances, and a 'no/against' vote on any ballot question is a vote against changing current law or existing circumstances." Each ballot title shall appear on the official ballot but once. For each ballot title that is an amendment, the amendment number or letter shall be immediately followed by the description "(CONSTITUTIONAL)". For each ballot title that is a proposition, the proposition number or letters shall be immediately followed by the description "(STATUTORY)". Each ballot title shall be separated from the other ballot titles next to it by heavy black lines and shall be followed by the words "YES/FOR" and "NO/AGAINST", along with a place for an eligible elector to designate his or her choice by a mark as instructed.

For purposes of preparing an audio ballot as part of an accessible voting system:

In lieu of the parenthetical description preceding a ballot title that is an amendment required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the audio ballot shall include the following: "The following ballot question proposes a change to the Colorado constitution."; and

In lieu of the parenthetical description preceding a ballot title that is a proposition required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the audio ballot shall include the following: "The following ballot question proposes a change to the Colorado Revised Statutes.".

A voter desiring to vote for the measure shall designate his or her choice by a mark in the place for "yes/for"; a voter desiring to vote against the measure shall designate his or her choice by a mark in the place for "no/against"; and the votes marked shall be counted accordingly. Any measure approved by the people of the state shall be printed with the acts of the next general assembly.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 685, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1180, § 74, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 434, § 11, effective May 8.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 189, § 17, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 297, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1175, § 12, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 840, § 28, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 688, § 41, effective May 17; (2)(a) and (3) amended, (HB 12-1089), ch. 70, p. 242, § 3, effective January 1, 2013.

1-40-116. Validation - ballot issues - random sampling - rules.

For ballot issues, each section of a petition to which there is attached an affidavit of the registered elector who circulated the petition that each signature thereon is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be and that to the best of the knowledge and belief of the affiant each of the persons signing the petition was at the time of signing a registered elector shall be prima facie evidence that the signatures are genuine and true, that the petitions were circulated in accordance with the provisions of this article, and that the form of the petition is in accordance with this article.

Upon submission of the petition, the secretary of state shall examine each name and signature on the petition. The petition shall not be available to the public for a period of no more than thirty calendar days for the examination. The secretary shall assure that the information required by sections 1-40-110 and 1-40-111 is complete, that the information on each signature line was written by the person making the signature, and that no signatures have been added to any sections of the petition after the affidavit required by section 1-40-111 (2) has been executed.

No signature shall be counted unless the signer is a registered elector and eligible to vote on the measure. A person shall be deemed a registered elector if the person's name and address appear on the master voting list kept by the secretary of state at the time of signing the section of the petition. In addition, the secretary of state shall not count the signature of any person whose information is not complete or was not completed by the elector or a person qualified to assist the elector. The secretary of state may adopt rules consistent with this subsection (3) for the examination and verification of signatures.

The secretary of state shall examine the signatures on the petition by use of random sampling. The random sample of signatures to be examined must be drawn so that every signature filed with the secretary of state is given an equal opportunity to be included in the sample. The secretary of state is authorized to engage in rule-making to establish the appropriate methodology for conducting such random sample.

The random sampling to validate signatures on a petition proposing an initiated law must include an examination of no less than five percent of the signatures, but in no event fewer than four thousand signatures. If the random sample examination establishes that the number of valid signatures is ninety percent or less of the number of registered eligible electors needed to find the petition sufficient, the secretary of state shall deem the petition to be not sufficient. If the random sample establishes that the number of valid signatures totals one hundred ten percent or more of the number of required signatures of registered eligible electors, the secretary of state shall deem the petition sufficient. If the random sample shows the number of valid signatures to be more than ninety percent but less than one hundred ten percent of the number of signatures of registered eligible electors needed to declare the petition sufficient, the secretary of state shall order the examination and validation of each signature filed.

The random sampling to validate signatures on a petition proposing an amendment to the state constitution must include an examination of no fewer than five percent of the signatures, but in no event less than four thousand signatures. If the random sample establishes that the number of valid signatures is ninety percent or less of the number of registered electors required by section 1 (2) of article V of the state constitution to find the petition sufficient, the secretary of state shall deem the petition to be not sufficient. If the random sample shows the number of valid signatures to be more than ninety percent of the number of registered electors required by section 1 (2) of article V of the state constitution to declare the petition sufficient, the secretary of state shall order the examination of each signature filed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 686, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 435, § 12, effective May 8.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (SB 17-152), ch. 169, p. 618, § 5, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-109 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 1-40-116 was relocated. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-40-117. Statement of sufficiency - cure.

After examining the petition:

If the petition proposes a law, the secretary of state shall issue a statement as to whether a sufficient number of valid signatures appears to have been submitted to certify the petition to the ballot; or

If the petition proposes an amendment to the state constitution, the secretary of state shall issue a statement as to whether a sufficient number of valid signatures from each state senate district and a sufficient total number of valid signatures appear to have been submitted to certify the petition to the ballot.

If the petition proposes an initiated law and was validated by random sample, the statement must contain the total number of signatures submitted and whether the number of signatures presumed valid was ninety percent of the required total or less or one hundred ten percent of the required total or more.

If the secretary declares that the petition appears not to have a sufficient number of valid signatures, the statement issued by the secretary must specify the number of sufficient and insufficient signatures. The secretary shall identify by section number and line number within the section those signatures found to be insufficient and the grounds for the insufficiency. Such information shall be kept on file for public inspection in accordance with section 1-40-118.

Repealed.

During the review of a petition, the secretary of state shall notify the designated representatives of the proponents of any errors and insufficiencies regarding circulator affidavits. Upon the receipt of such a notification, the designated representatives of the proponents have five calendar days from the date of receipt of the notice to cure the errors and insufficiencies described in the notice. To cure a circulator affidavit, the designated representative of the proponents must provide the secretary of state with a new circulator affidavit that corrects the errors of the previously submitted affidavit.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 687, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2009:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1176, § 13, effective May 15.

L. 2011:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 11-1072), ch. 255, p. 1104, § 5, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-152), ch. 169, p. 619, § 6, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(3)(b) repealed and (4) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1669, § 73, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-109 as it existed prior to 1993.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsection (3)(b), see section 1 of chapter 255, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.